Utah statutes.
32B-7-304.   Hearings.

(1)  A local authority shall conduct a hearing under this part if one of the following requests a hearing before the local authority:

(a)  an off-premise beer retailer;

(b)  an individual who directly supervises the sale of beer to a patron for consumption off the premises of the off-premise beer retailer; or

(c)  an individual who sells beer to a patron for consumption off the premises of the off-premise beer retailer.

(2)  A local authority conducting a hearing under this section shall provide the person requesting the hearing:

(a)  notice of the hearing; and

(b)  an opportunity to be heard at the hearing.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

